Washington statutes.
RCW 2.04.200

Effect of rules upon statutes.

When and as the rules of courts herein authorized shall be promulgated all laws in conflict therewith shall be and become of no further force or effect.

[ 1925 ex.s. c 118 s 2; RRS s 13-2.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 81(b), RAP 1.1(g).